Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201577-1744
Collection of taxes; county treasurer; credit on settlement for delinquent personal property taxes.

The county treasurer shall not be entitled to credit on the final settlement for delinquent personal property tax until he or she has filed with the clerk an affidavit that he or she has fully complied with the provisions of sections 77-1715 to 77-1725.01 relating to the giving of notice and issuing of distress warrants and been unable to collect the tax due thereon by reason of a want of personal property of the owner thereof and that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief no personal property of any such owner is in the county.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 170, p. 452;

R.S.1913, § 6498;

C.S.1922, § 6026;

C.S.1929, § 77-1931;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 9, p. 642;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 9, p. 427;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 9, p. 613;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1931;

R.S.1943, § 77-1744;

Laws 2015, LB408, § 1.
August 30, 2015